Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,115
Judge; retention in office; how determined.

After May 6, 1963, the right of any judge of any separate juvenile court to continue in office for another term shall be determined by the electorate in the manner provided by Article V, section 21, of the Constitution of Nebraska and the laws of this state.

Laws 1963, c. 244, § 3, p. 738;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 43-230.03;

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 72.

For provisions for retention in office, see sections 24-813 to 24-818.